Tennessee statutes. Title 16 Courts
Part 4

Rule Making

16-3-401. Supreme court rules of practice.

The supreme court may make rules of practice for the better disposal of business before it.

Code 1858, § 4504 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 3, § 19); Shan., § 6337; Code 1932, § 10638; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-311.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 101.

Law Reviews.

Discovery - Thomas v. Oldfield: Protecting the Necessary Boundaries of Discovery While Recognizing the Realities of Modern Litigation (Jason G. McCuistion), 40 U. Mem. L. Rev. 485 (2009).

Cross-References. Delinquency in student loan repayment, § 23-3-111.

Law Reviews.

The Theoretical Foundations of the Proposed Tennessee Rules of Appellate Procedure, I. Introduction (John L. Sobieski, Jr.), 45 Tenn. L. Rev. 162.

16-3-402. Other courts — General rules of practice.

The supreme court has the power to prescribe by general rules the forms of process, writs, pleadings and motions, and the practice and procedure in all of the courts of this state in all civil and criminal suits, actions and proceedings.

Acts 1965, ch. 227, § 1; 1975, ch. 376, § 1; T.C.A., § 16-112.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 22 Tenn. Juris., Rules of Court, § 2.

Law Reviews.

Discovery - Thomas v. Oldfield: Protecting the Necessary Boundaries of Discovery While Recognizing the Realities of Modern Litigation (Jason G. McCuistion), 40 U. Mem. L. Rev. 485 (2009).

Judicial Notice in Tennessee (Robert Banks, Jr. and Elizabeth T. Collins), 21 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 431 (1991).

16-3-403. Rules not to affect substantive rights — Consistency with constitutions.

The rules prescribed by the supreme court pursuant to § 16-3-402 shall not abridge, enlarge or modify any substantive right, and shall be consistent with the constitutions of the United States and Tennessee.

Acts 1965, ch. 227, § 2; T.C.A., § 16-113.

Law Reviews.

Champerty as We Know It (R. D. Cox), 13 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 139 (1983).

Cited: State v. Ellis, 598 S.W.2d 826, 1980 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 311 (Tenn. Crim. App. 1980); State v. Pettus, 986 S.W.2d 540, 1999 Tenn. LEXIS 44 (Tenn. 1999); Corum v. Holston Health & Rehab. Ctr., 104 S.W.3d 451, 2003 Tenn. LEXIS 338 (Tenn. 2003).

16-3-404. Effective date of rules — Approval of rules by general assembly.

The supreme court shall fix the effective date of all its rules; provided, that the rules shall not take effect until they have been reported to the general assembly by the chief justice at or after the beginning of a regular session of the general assembly, but not later than February 1 during the session, and until they have been approved by resolutions of both the house of representatives and the senate.

Acts 1965, ch. 227, § 3; T.C.A., § 16-114; Acts 1985, ch. 24, § 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 22 Tenn. Juris., Rules of Court, § 2.

Law Reviews.

The Theoretical Foundations of the Proposed Tennessee Rules of Appellate Procedure, I. Introduction (John L. Sobieski, Jr.), 45 Tenn. L. Rev. 162.

Cited: State v. Ellis, 598 S.W.2d 826, 1980 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 311 (Tenn. Crim. App. 1980); Malone v. State, 707 S.W.2d 541, 1985 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 3258 (Tenn. Crim. App. 1985); Lock v. National Union Fire Ins. Co., 809 S.W.2d 483, 1991 Tenn. LEXIS 154 (Tenn. 1991); Alley v. State, 958 S.W.2d 138, 1997 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 428 (Tenn. Crim. App. 1997); State v. Brewer, 989 S.W.2d 349, 1997 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 989 (Tenn. Crim. App. 1997); Memphis Planned Parenthood, Inc. v. Sundquist, 175 F.3d 456, 1999 FED App. 162P, 1999 U.S. App. LEXIS 8481 (6th Cir. Tenn. 1999).

16-3-405. Publication of rules.

All rules adopted by the supreme court shall be published in the Tennessee Code Annotated and may be publicized both before and after becoming effective in a manner that the supreme court deems appropriate.

Acts 1965, ch. 227, § 4; T.C.A., § 16-115.

Compiler's Notes. The Supreme Court Rules are published in the Tennessee Court Rules Annotated, which is updated by replacement volumes in July of each year and are updated by supplementation once each year.

Cross-References. Publication of Tennessee Code Annotated, § 1-1-105.

16-3-406. Laws in conflict with rules nullified.

After the rules have become effective, all laws in conflict with the rules shall be of no further force or effect.

Acts 1965, ch. 227, § 5; T.C.A., § 16-116.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in the Advisory Commission Comments under T.R.A.P. 13.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 63; 22 Tenn. Juris., Rules of Court, § 2.

Tennessee Law of Evidence (2nd ed., Cohen, Paine and Sheppeard), §§ 605.1, 610.1.

Law Reviews.

The Procedural Details of the Proposed Tennessee Rules of Appellate Procedure, II. Initiation of An Appeal (John L. Sobieski, Jr.), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 4.

Cited: State v. Ellis, 598 S.W.2d 826, 1980 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 311 (Tenn. Crim. App. 1980); Haynes v. McKenzie Memorial Hospital, 667 S.W.2d 497, 1984 Tenn. App. LEXIS 3274 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1984); Lock v. National Union Fire Ins. Co., 809 S.W.2d 483, 1991 Tenn. LEXIS 154 (Tenn. 1991); Arnold v. City of Chattanooga, 19 S.W.3d 779, 1999 Tenn. App. LEXIS 765 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1999); State v. West, 19 S.W.3d 753, 2000 Tenn. LEXIS 244 (Tenn. 2000); Fields v. State, 40 S.W.3d 450, 2001 Tenn. LEXIS 110 (Tenn. 2001); State v. Mallard, 40 S.W.3d 473, 2001 Tenn. LEXIS 235 (Tenn. 2001); Corum v. Holston Health & Rehab. Ctr., 104 S.W.3d 451, 2003 Tenn. LEXIS 338 (Tenn. 2003); The Tennessean v. Tenn. Dep't of Pers., — S.W.3d —, 2007 Tenn. App. LEXIS 267 (Tenn. Ct. App. Apr. 27, 2007); Rajvongs v. Wright, — S.W.3d —, 2012 Tenn. App. LEXIS 393 (Tenn. Ct. App. June 18, 2012); Webb v. Roberson, — S.W.3d —, 2013 Tenn. App. LEXIS 261 (Tenn. Ct. App. Apr. 17, 2013).

16-3-407. Additional or supplementary rules of other courts.

Each of the other courts of this state may adopt additional or supplementary rules of practice and procedure not inconsistent with or in conflict with the rules prescribed by the supreme court.

Acts 1965, ch. 227, § 6; T.C.A., § 16-117.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 22 Tenn. Juris., Rules of Court, § 2.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281.

The Tennessee Court System — Court of Appeals (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 219.

The Tennessee Court System — General Sessions Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 375.

The Tennessee Court System — The County Court, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 419.

Attorney General Opinions. It is not unauthorized practice of law for a court to develop form petitions and orders and to direct non-attorney members of the clerk's office to make petitions available for use by pro se litigants seeking to have their driving privileges restored, OAG 04-071 (4/21/04).

Cited: State v. Huskins, 989 S.W.2d 735, 1998 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 1020 (Tenn. Crim. App. 1998); Metropolitan Gov't of Nashville v. Cuozzo, — S.W.3d —, 2008 Tenn. App. LEXIS 498 (Tenn. Ct. App. Aug. 25, 2008).

16-3-408. Courts — Facsimile transmission of documents — Rules and procedures.

The supreme court is urged to develop court rules and procedures to control the process of courts using fax transmissions of documents. The court rules and procedures should provide for the following:

The type of document that may be faxed;

The length of restriction, if any, of a document that may be faxed;

The type of equipment and paper that must be used by clerks' offices;

The amount, if any, of fees to be charged for the faxing of documents;

The payment of regular filing fees of the court;

The time of filing of a faxed document;

Requirements, if any, for filing of original documents or original signatures;

Requirements, if any, for maintenance of transmittal reports of faxed documents; and

Any other rule or procedure the court deems appropriate.

Acts 1991, ch. 146, § 3.

Cross-References. Facsimile transmissions, court business and filings, § 16-1-113.